Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.420

Attorney general as legal advisor.

The attorney general shall give the director opinions upon all questions of law relating to the construction or interpretation of this chapter, or arising in the administration thereof, that may be submitted to the director, and shall act as attorney for the director in all actions and proceedings brought by or against the director under or pursuant to any provisions of this chapter.

[ 2008 c 23 s 43; 1997 c 322 s 23; 1941 c 252 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-32. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 8. Formerly RCW 18.85.345.]